South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3145.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-6560 (A) and (D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Any time a motor vehicle is stopped by a state or local law enforcement officer with or without a citation being issued or an arrest being made, the officer who initiated the stop must complete a data collection form designed by the Department of Public Safety that must include information regarding the age, gender, and race or ethnicity of the driver of the vehicle.  This information may be gathered and transmitted electronically under the supervision of the department which shall develop and maintain a database storing the information collected. The department must promulgate rules and regulations with regard to the collection and submission of the information gathered. (D) This section must be reviewed by the Senate Transportation Committee and the House of Representatives Education and Public Works Committee during the 2010 Session of the General Assemblybiennially beginning 2025. The committees must conduct a hearing, consider the data, and take testimony during the legislative session in which the report is received. If the report is received while the legislature is not in session, the committees shall hold their hearings during the next legislative session. Both committees shall make a complete report setting forth recommendations of appropriate changes, if any, to this sectionexisting law before the end of the 2010 Sessionsession. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----